Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1071
Power to borrow money; how construed.

Section 79-1070 shall be independent of and in addition to any other provisions of the laws of the State of Nebraska, and such section shall not be considered amendatory of or limited by any other laws of the State of Nebraska. Such section does not prohibit or limit the issuance of notes or borrowing by school districts in accordance with any other applicable laws of the State of Nebraska if the school board or board of education determines to issue such notes or incur borrowings under such laws.

Laws 1991, LB 382, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1385;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 717.